Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-113 Violation of rejection,
cancellation and nonrenewal provisions. (a) Whoever knowingly violates,
or conspires to violate, the provisions of section 431:10C-110 and section
431:10C-111 shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000
for each separate violation. Each violation of section 431:10C-110 with
respect to a policyholder or applicant for insurance shall constitute a
separate violation.

(b) The principles of law and equity regarding
fraud and misrepresentation of material fact shall apply with respect to
optional-additional coverages which are in excess of those which the insurer is
required to make available to insureds under section 431:10C-302. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Cross References

Insurance fraud, see §431:10C-307.7.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next